North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-25 Seed Sales Regulations [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11]

4-25-01.
Definition of agricultural seed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-25-02.
Prohibitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-25-03.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-25-04.
Nonresident seed dealer license. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-25-05.
Grain standards. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 95, § 6.